Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 Tennessee Commission on Children and Youth Act of 1988
37-3-116. Resource mapping of funding sources — Report.

The commission shall design and oversee a resource mapping of all federal and state funding sources and funding streams that support the health, safety, permanence, growth, development and education of children in this state from conception through the age of majority or so long as they may remain in the custody of the state. The resource mapping shall include, but not be limited to:

An inventory of all federal and state funding sources that support children in this state;

An inventory of all state, federal or government subsidized services and programs offered to children in this state, set out by program, target population, geographical region, agency or any other grouping that would assist the general assembly in determining whether there are overlapping programs that lead to duplication within the state, gaps in service delivery and any administrative inefficiencies generally;

A description of the manner in which the funds are being used within the agencies or organizations, the performance measures in place to assess the use of such funding and the intended outcomes of the programs and services;

Government mandates for the use of the funds, if any; and

An inventory of the funds for which the state may be eligible, but is currently not receiving or using, and the reasons why the funds are not being used.

The commission shall update the report each year and shall subsequently assure that the resource map is periodically and timely updated, so as to maintain a current resource map of the funds used to support children in the state.

The comptroller of the treasury and each department of state government or agency in this state shall provide assistance upon request to the commission in effectuating the purpose of this section.

On or before February 15, 2009, a preliminary report shall be provided by the commission; and on or before April 15, 2010, and each successive year thereafter, the commission shall provide a full report to the judiciary, education, and health and welfare committees of the senate, the education and health committees of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families. The full report shall include, but not be limited to, the resource map and any recommendations, including proposed legislation, for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of programs offered to children in this state.

Acts 2008, ch. 1197, § 1; 2009, ch. 344, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(l ); 2013, ch. 236, § 79; 2019, ch. 345, § 41.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1197, § 1 purported to add this section as §37-3-112; however, since Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 1 added §37-3-112, the section added by ch. 1197 was placed in this location.

For the Preamble to the act regarding resource mapping of funds used to support children, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1197.

Former part 1, §§37-3-101 —37-3-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 865, §§ 1, 3-9, 13; 1985, ch. 478, § 34; T.C.A., §§37-7-101 —37-7-109), concerning the children's services commission, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 979, § 2.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “, the education and health committees of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “and the civil justice, education and health committees of the house of representatives” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.